Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.050

Application for registration—Filing of documents—Consent to service of process—Fee.

(1) A broker-dealer, salesperson, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative may apply for registration by filing with the director or his or her authorized agent an application together with a consent to service of process in such form as the director shall prescribe and payment of the fee prescribed in RCW 21.20.340.

(2) A federal covered adviser shall file such documents as the director may, by rule or otherwise, require together with a consent to service of process and the payment of the fee prescribed in RCW 21.20.340.

[ 2011 c 336 s 595; 1998 c 15 s 4; 1994 c 256 s 6; 1981 c 272 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 3; 1961 c 37 s 2; 1959 c 282 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.